District of Columbia statutes.
34-1112

Utilities to have offices in the District of Columbia; books and records to be kept in the District; records may be kept at general office of utility.

Each public utility shall have an office within the District of Columbia in which it shall keep all such books, accounts, papers, and records as shall be required by the Commission to be kept within the District of Columbia. No books, accounts, papers, or records required by the Commission to be kept within the District of Columbia shall be at any time removed from the District of Columbia, except upon such condition as may be prescribed by the Commission; provided, that public utilities operating in the District of Columbia and elsewhere who have their general or executive offices outside of the District, may continue to keep their books, accounts, records, and so forth, at their executive or general offices, such public utilities being required, however, to produce before the Commission such books, accounts, records, and papers from time to time as the Commission may order.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 979, ch. 150, § 8, par. 13

Cross References

Rules and regulations, power of Commission to adopt, see § 34-902.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-512.
1973 Ed., § 43-312.